Montana, session 2025, HB273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Definitions. As used in [sections 1 and 2], unless the context clearly
indicates otherwise, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Advanced beneficiary notice" means a form as defined and under the allowed circumstances
as regulated by the centers for medicare and medicaid services from a health care provider informing a
medicare beneficiary that a particular health care service may not be covered by medicare. The notice must be
signed by the patient and include:
(a) details about the health care service;
(b) the reasons medicare may not cover the health care service;
(c) the estimated cost to the beneficiary; and
(d) a statement that the patient will be responsible for covering the costs of the health care service
that are not covered by medicare if the patient chooses to proceed with the health care service.
(2) "Consumer reporting agency" has the same meaning as provided in 31-3-102.
(3) "Extraordinary collection action" means any of the following:
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 273

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0273.2
(a) selling a patient's debt owed for health care services to a third party or otherwise authorizing a
third party to collect the debt in a name other than the name of the health care provider, except if, prior to the
sale or authorization, the health care provider has entered into a legally binding written agreement with the third
party pursuant to which:
(i) the third party complies with the requirements in [section 2] for a health care provider to collect
a patient's debt for the health care services provided; and
(ii) the third party is prohibited from charging interest on the debt in excess of that described in 31-
1-107;
(b) filing a debt collection lawsuit; or
(c) placing a lien on a patient's bank account.
(4) (a) "Health care facility" mean any person, entity, or institution operating a physical or virtual
location that holds itself out to the public as providing health care services through itself, through its employees,
or through third-party health care providers.
(b) The term includes but is not limited to:
(i) hospitals and other licensed inpatient centers;
(ii) ambulatory surgical or treatment centers;
(iii) skilled nursing centers;
(iv) residential treatment centers;
(v) urgent care centers;
(vi) diagnostic, laboratory, and imaging centers; and
(vii) rehabilitation and other therapeutic health settings.
(5) "Health care provider" means:
(a) a physician or other health care practitioner licensed, accredited, or certified to perform health
care services consistent with state law or any agent or third-party representative of the physician or other health
care practitioner; or
(b) a health care facility or its agent.
(6) "Health care services" means services for the diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of
a health condition, illness, injury, or disease, including the provision of pharmaceutical products or services or
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 273

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0273.2
durable medical equipment.
(7) "Medical debt" means any obligation for the payment of money arising out of any agreement or
contract, express or implied, for the provision of health care services from a health care provider.
(8) "Patient" means a person who seeks or receives services from a health care provider. For the
purposes of [sections 1 and 2], "patient" includes a parent if the patient is a minor, a legal guardian if the patient
is an adult under guardianship, or any person contractually or otherwise liable for the financial obligations of the
person receiving goods or services from the health care provider.
(9) "Prohibited collection action" means any of the following actions done to collect a patient's debt
owed for health care services:
(a) causing or threatening a patient's arrest;
(b) placing or threatening to place a lien on a patient's primary residence, except as required under
42 U.S.C. 1396p to participate in the Montana medicaid program;
(c) foreclosing or threatening to foreclose on a patient's primary residence, except as required
under 42 U.S.C. 1396p to participate in the Montana medicaid program;
(d) garnishing or threatening to garnish wages or a state income tax refund; or
(e) reporting or threatening to report adverse information about the patient to a consumer reporting
agency.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Limitations on health care collection actions. (1) A person may not
engage in a prohibited collection action to collect a patient's debt owed for health care services.
(2) A person may not engage in an extraordinary collection action until 180 120 days after a health
care provider sends a patient the first bill for the health care services provided.
(3) At least 30 days before engaging in an extraordinary collection action, a health care provider
shall provide the patient with a notice containing the following:
(a) the extraordinary collection action that will be initiated to obtain payment; and
(b) the deadline after which the health care provider will initiate the extraordinary collection action.
(4) A person may not engage in an extraordinary collection action to collect a patient's debt owed
for health care services during a state or federally declared state of emergency or a public health emergency.
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 273

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0273.2
(5) A person that knows or should have known about an internal review, external review, or other
appeal of a health insurance decision that is pending now or was pending within the previous 180 days may
not:
(a) communicate with the patient regarding the patient's debt owed for health care services for the
purpose of seeking to collect the debt;
(b) file a debt collection lawsuit or arbitration proceeding to collect the patient's debt owed for
health care services; or
(c) authorize a third party to collect the debt in a name other than the name of the health care
provider or sell the patient's debt to a third party.
(6) A patient's debt is void and unenforceable if a person willfully violates this section.
(7) A patient is entitled to exemption from execution of the patient's interest, not to exceed $3,000
in aggregate value, in any bank account, savings and loan accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities. The
amount of $3,000 in value must be automatically protected. The maximum exemption under this subsection
may not exceed $3,000, regardless of the number of existing separate bank accounts, savings and loan
accounts, stocks, bonds, or other securities.
(8)The provisions of this section do not apply if a patient signed an advance beneficiary notice
before receiving the health care service.

(8) (A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (8)(B), NOTHING IN THIS SECTION MAY BE CONSTRUED AS
PROHIBITING A HEALTH CARE PROVIDER FROM PROVIDING A PATIENT WITH AN ADVANCE BENEFICIARY NOTICE PRIOR TO
PROVIDING HEALTH CARE SERVICES UNDER THE MANDATORY CIRCUMSTANCES AS REQUIRED BY 42 U.S.C. 1395PP.

(B) A HEALTH CARE SERVICE PROVIDED FOLLOWING PATIENT RECEIPT OR SIGNATURE OF A MANDATORY
ADVANCE BENEFICIARY NOTICE IS SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SECTION.

Section 3. Section 25-13-609, MCA, is amended to read:
"25-13-609. Personal property exempt subject to value limitations. A judgment debtor is entitled
to exemption from execution of the following:
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 273

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0273.2
(1) the judgment debtor's interest, not to exceed $7,000 in aggregate value, to the extent of a
value not exceeding $1,250 in any item of property, in household furnishings and goods, appliances, jewelry,
wearing apparel, books, firearms and other sporting goods, animals, feed, crops, and musical instruments;
(2) the judgment debtor's interest, not to exceed $4,000 in value, in one motor vehicle; and
(3) the judgment debtor's interest, not to exceed $4,500 in aggregate value, in any implements,
professional books, and tools, of the trade of the judgment debtor or a dependent of the judgment debtor; and
(4) the interest described in [section 2(7)]."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Codification instruction. [Sections 1 and 2] are intended to be codified
as an integral part of Title 30, chapter 14, part 26, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, part 26, apply to
[sections 1 and 2].

NEW SECTION. Section 5. Applicability. [This act] applies to any collection action on medical debt
occurring on or after October 1, 2025.
- END -
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 273